Maryland, session 2026, HB0599.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0599*

HOUSE BILL 599
Article – Health – General
19–319.
(a) To qualify for a license, an applicant and the hospital or related institution to
be operated shall meet the requirements of this section.
(K) (1) (I) TO QUALIFY FOR A LICENSE ON OR AFTER OCTOBER 1,
2026, THE HOSPITAL TO BE OPERATED SHALL QUALIFY AS A NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION UNDER FEDERAL LAW AND BE REGISTERED AS A NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION WITH THE STATE.
(II) A HOSPITAL THAT RECEIVES LICENSURE ON OR AFTER
OCTOBER 1, 2026, SHALL MAINTAIN STATUS AS A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION AS A
CONDITION OF LICENSURE.
(2) ON OR AFTER OCTOBER 1, 2026, THE OWNERSHIP OF A LICENSED
HOSPITAL MAY BE TRANSFERRED ONLY TO A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.